Vermont, session 2025-2026, H728.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. PURPOSE
The purpose of this act is to overrule the Vermont Supreme Court’s
decision in State v. Dixon, 169 Vt. 15 (1999), and allow the landlord of a
dwelling unit to obtain a no trespass order prohibiting the tenant’s invitees or
licensees from entering the dwelling unit’s common areas if the invitee or
licensee subject to the order has violated the terms of the lease agreement.
VT LEG #385191 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.728
2026 Page 2 of 4
Sec. 2. 13 V.S.A. § 3705 is amended to read:
§ 3705. UNLAWFUL TRESPASS
(a)(1) A person shall be imprisoned for not more than three months or fined
not more than $500.00, or both, if, without legal authority or the consent of the
person in lawful possession, the person enters or remains on any land or in any
place as to which notice against trespass is given by:
(A) actual communication by the person in lawful possession or the
person’s agent or by a law enforcement officer acting on behalf of such person
or the person’s agent;
(B) signs or placards so designed and situated as to give reasonable
notice; or
(C) in the case of abandoned property:
(i) signs or placards, posted by the owner, the owner’s agent, or a
law enforcement officer, and so designed and situated as to give reasonable
notice; or
(ii) actual communication by a law enforcement officer.
* * *
(d) A person who enters a building other than a residence, whose access is
normally locked, whether or not the access is actually locked, or a residence in
violation of an order of any court of competent jurisdiction in this State shall
VT LEG #385191 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.728
2026 Page 3 of 4
be imprisoned for not more than one year or fined not more than $500.00, or
both.
(e) A person who enters a dwelling house, whether or not a person is
actually present, knowing that the person is not licensed or privileged to do so
shall be imprisoned for not more than three years or fined not more than
$2,000.00, or both.
* * *
(g)(1) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section or any provision of
law to the contrary, a landlord of a dwelling unit may cause to be served an
order against trespass that prohibits a tenant’s invitees or licensees from
trespassing in the dwelling unit or any of the dwelling unit’s common areas if:
(A) the tenant responsible for the invitee or licensee consents to the
order;
(B) the invitee or licensee subject to the order has violated the terms
of the dwelling unit’s lease agreement; or
(C) the invitee or licensee has violated a State or federal law while on
the premises of the dwelling unit.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person who is served
an order against trespass issued pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection
has a limited right to appeal the order by bringing a small claims action against
the landlord under 12 V.S.A. chapter 187 within seven days after the order is
VT LEG #385191 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.728
2026 Page 4 of 4
served. The decision of the court in the small claims action shall be final and
not subject to appeal.
(3) As used in this subsection:
(A) “Dwelling unit” means a building or the part of a building that is
used as a home, residence, or sleeping place by one or more persons who
maintain a household.
(B) “Tenant” means a person entitled under a rental agreement to
occupy a residential dwelling unit to the exclusion of others.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #385191 v.1